California statutes. Financial Code
 in the unobstructed view of the public within the premises. The licensee shall provide to each of its agents the notice required by this section. In those locations operated by an agent, the agent, and not the licensee, shall be responsible for the failure to properly post the required notice.

(c) In the event that a licensee or agent conducts money transmission activity via an internet website or a mobile application that is not in a branch office, the commissioner may authorize an alternative form of the notice required in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.   (AB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

(a) No licensee shall sell or issue any form of payment instrument in California unless a certified copy of the payment instrument has first been filed with the commissioner. The payment instrument shall clearly identify the licensee as the issuer.

(b) The commissioner may by order or regulation declare that a form of payment instrument is prohibited if it is misleading in any material respect or
 otherwise does not comply with applicable law.

(c) A payment instrument that identifies the agent through which the licensee sells the payment instrument shall identify the agent as such and shall identify the licensee at least as conspicuously as it does the agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

(a) A licensee shall prominently display on its internet website a toll-free telephone number through which a customer may contact the licensee for customer service issues and receive live customer assistance.

(b) The telephone line shall be operative at least 10 hours per day, Monday through Friday, excluding federal holidays.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 453, Sec. 2.   (AB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Examinations, Special Reports, and Records [2120. - 2127.]

2120.

(a) The commissioner may at any time and from time to time examine the business and any office, within or outside this state, of any licensee or any agent of a licensee in order to ascertain whether that business is being conducted in a lawful manner and whether all money transmission is properly accounted for.

(b) The directors, officers, and employees of any licensee or agent of a licensee being
 examined by the commissioner shall exhibit to the commissioner, on request, any or all of the licensee’s accounts, books, correspondence, memoranda, papers, and other records and shall otherwise facilitate the examination so far as it may be in their power to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2121.

The commissioner may consult and cooperate with other state or federal money transmission regulators in enforcing and administering this division. They may jointly pursue examinations and take other official action that they are otherwise empowered to take.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 23.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2122.

A licensee shall file a report with the commissioner within five business days after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence any of the following events:

(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Secs. 101-110, incl.) for bankruptcy or reorganization.

(b) The filing of a petition by or
 against the licensee for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.

(c) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend its license in a state or country in which the licensee engages in business or is licensed.

(d) The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee’s bond or other security.

(e) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of an executive officer, manager, director, or person in control of the licensee for a felony.

(f) A charge or conviction of an agent for a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2123.

A licensee that is a money services business under the regulations adopted pursuant to the United States Bank Secrecy Act (31 C.F.R. Chapter X) and the agents of the licensee that are money services businesses shall comply with those regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 104.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2124.

(a) A licensee shall maintain the following records for determining its compliance with this division for at least three years:

(1) A record of each payment instrument or stored value obligation sold.

(2) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts.

(3) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records.

(4) Records of outstanding payment instruments and stored value obligations.

(5) Records of each
 payment instrument and stored-value obligation paid within the three-year period.

(6) A list of the last known names and addresses of all of the licensee’s agents and their branch offices.

(7) Any other records the commissioner reasonably requires by order or regulation.

(b) A licensee or its agent shall maintain records of any receipts provided pursuant to Section 2102 for six months or a longer period of time specified in the contract between the licensee and its agent.

(c) The items specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) may be maintained in any form of record.

(d) Records may be maintained outside this state if they are made available to the commissioner on seven days’ notice that is
 sent in a record.

(e) If records not required to be maintained in English pursuant to Section 456 are in a language other than English, the licensee shall provide records translated into English within seven days’ notice that is sent in a record.

(f) Each licensee shall maintain any other records required by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 499, Sec. 15.   (AB 2209)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2125.

A licensee adding or replacing a key individual shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide notice to the commissioner within 15 days after the effective date of the key individual’s appointment.

(1) Within 90 days of compliance with this subdivision, the commissioner may issue a notice of disapproval of a key individual if the competence, experience, character, or integrity of the individual supports a determination by the commissioner that it is not in the best interests of the public or the licensee’s customers to permit the individual to be a key individual of the licensee.

(2) If the notice provided pursuant to this subdivision is not
 disapproved within 90 days after the date on which the notice was provided, the key individual shall be deemed approved. This timeframe does not apply to applications filed pursuant to Section 2035.

(b) Provide information, as applicable, required by Sections 80.4105 and 80.4105.10 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, as amended from time to time, within 45 days of the effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 10.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2127.

Before January 1, 2025, a person licensed under this division to engage in the business of money transmission shall not be subject to a provision of the act adding this section to the extent that the provision conflicts with the law in effect on December 31, 2023, or to the extent the provision establishes new requirements not imposed under the law in effect on December 31, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 11.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Additional Enforcement Provisions [2148. - 2153.]

2148.

(a) If it appears to the commissioner that a licensee is violating or has violated, or is failing or has failed to comply with any law of this state, the commissioner may direct the licensee to comply with the law by an order issued under the commissioner’s official seal, or if it appears to the commissioner that any licensee is conducting or has conducted its business in an unsafe or injurious manner, the commissioner may in like manner direct it to discontinue the unsafe or injurious practices. The order shall require the licensee to show cause before the commissioner, at a time and place to be fixed by the commissioner, as to why the order should not be observed.

(b) If, upon any hearing held pursuant to subdivision (a), the commissioner finds that the licensee is
 violating or has violated, or is failing or has failed to comply with any law of this state or is conducting or has conducted its business in an unsafe or injurious manner, the commissioner may make a final order directing it to comply with the law or to discontinue the unsafe or injurious practices. A licensee shall comply with the final order unless, within 10 days after the issuance of the order, its enforcement is restrained in a proceeding brought by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 7.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2149.

(a) The commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking a license, or taking possession of and placing a licensee in receivership, if after notice and an opportunity for hearing, the commissioner finds that:

(1) The licensee is violating this division or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this division, or a condition of approval issued under this division.

(2) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the commissioner.

(3) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence.

(4) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the licensee, or any director, officer, employee, or person in control of a licensee, indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the person to provide money transmission services.

(5) The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice.

(6) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.

(7) The licensee does not remove an agent after the commissioner issues and serves upon the licensee a final order including a finding that the agent has violated this division.

(8) The licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or any person has applied for any such relief under that law against the licensee and the licensee has by any affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or the relief has been granted.

(9) Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time when the licensee applied for its license, would have been grounds for denying the application.

(b) In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the commissioner may consider the size and condition of the licensee’s provision of money transmission services, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the
 violation of this division, and the previous conduct of the person involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 25.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2150.

(a) The commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking the designation of an agent if, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, the commissioner finds that:

(1) The agent violated this division or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this division.

(2) The agent did not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the commissioner.

(3) The agent engaged in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence.

(4) The agent is convicted of a violation of a state or federal
 anti-money laundering statute.

(5) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the agent, or any director, officer, employee, or person in control of the agent, indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the agent to provide money transmissions.

(6) The agent is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice.

(7) The agent has made or caused to be made in any application or report filed with the commissioner or in any proceeding before the commissioner, any statement that was at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or has omitted to state in any of those applications, reports, or proceedings any material fact
 which is required to be stated therein.

(8) The agent is an agent of a licensee who, because of its operations and financial condition, is not competent to supervise and monitor the agent.

(9) The agent will not comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(b) In determining whether an agent is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the commissioner may consider the size and condition of the agent’s provision of money transmission services, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this
 division or a rule adopted or order issued under this division, and the previous conduct of the agent.

(c) No licensee shall appoint as an agent any person with respect to whom an order issued under this section is in effect.

(d) No person with respect to whom an order issued under this section is in effect shall become or continue to be an agent of any licensee.

(e) If applicable, the commissioner may disclose to the licensee criminal history information upon which an order is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 26.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2150.1.

(a) Every order, decision, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to review in accordance with law.

(b) Whenever the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of any licensee, the licensee, within 10 days after that taking, if it deems itself aggrieved thereby, may apply to the superior court in the county in which the head office of the licensee is located to enjoin
 further proceedings. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing and a determination of the facts upon the merits, may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender the property and business to the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2150.2.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 2149 is true with respect to any licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the public interest, the commissioner may issue an order immediately suspending or revoking the licensee’s license.

(b) Within 30 days after the license is suspended or revoked pursuant to subdivision (a), the licensee may file with the
 commissioner an application for a hearing on the suspension or revocation.

(c) If the commissioner fails to commence a hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) or within a longer period of time agreed to by the licensee, the suspension or revocation shall be deemed rescinded.

(d) Within 30 days after the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the suspension or revocation. Otherwise, the suspension or revocation shall be deemed rescinded.

(e) The right of the licensee to petition for judicial review of the suspension or revocation shall not be affected by the failure of the licensee to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the suspension or revocation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2151.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 2150 is true with respect to any agent and that it is necessary for the protection of the public interest, the commissioner may issue an order immediately suspending or barring that agent from continuing to be or becoming an agent of any licensee during the period for which that order is in effect.

(b) Within 30 days after an
 order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), the licensee or the agent or former agent with respect to whom the order was issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(c) If the commissioner fails to commence a hearing within 20 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) or within a longer period of time agreed to by the parties, the suspension or revocation shall be deemed rescinded.

(d) Within 30 days after the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

(e) The right of the licensee or agent or former agent to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of that person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to subdivision
 (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2151.1.

The commissioner may assess a civil penalty against a person that violates this division or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this division in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or, in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day or part thereof during which the violation continues, plus this state’s costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 27.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2152.

(a) A person that intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this division or that intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a record is guilty of a felony.

(b) A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this division without being licensed or exempt from licensure under this division is guilty of a felony.

(c) Nothing in this division limits the power of the state to punish any person for any act that constitutes a crime under any statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 28.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2153.

The enforcement provisions of this division are in addition to any other enforcement powers that the commissioner may have under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 29.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Miscellaneous Provisions [2170. - 2176.]

2170.

Any licensee may surrender its license by filing with the commissioner the license and a report with any information as the commissioner requires. The voluntary surrender of the license shall become effective at the time and upon the conditions as the commissioner specifies by order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2171.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, illegal, or unenforceable, that invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division that can be given effect without the invalid, illegal, or unenforceable provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this division are declared to be severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 30.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2172.

(a) A license issued under the former Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1800), Chapter 14A (commencing with Section 1851), or the former Division 16 (commencing with Section 33000) that is in effect immediately before January 1, 2011, shall remain in effect as a valid license under this division.

(b) Any person that, prior to January 1, 2011, was not required to obtain a license under the former Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1800), Chapter 14A (commencing with Section 1851), or Division 16 (commencing with Section 33000), but is required to have a license under this division, shall file an application for a license pursuant to this division by July 1, 2011, in order
 to continue conducting money transmission in this state directly or through agents. If the application is timely filed and pending with the commissioner, that person may continue to conduct money transmission in this state, until the application has been approved, abandoned, or denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 31.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2174.

(a) The commissioner may prepare written decisions, opinion letters, and other formal written guidance to be issued to persons seeking clarification regarding the requirements of this division.

(b) The commissioner shall make public on the commissioner’s Internet Web site all written decisions, opinion letters, and other formal written guidance issued to persons seeking clarification regarding the requirements of this division. The commissioner may, at his or her discretion or upon request by an applicant or licensee, redact proprietary or other confidential information regarding an applicant or licensee from any decision, letter, or other written guidance issued in connection with an applicant or
 licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 533, Sec. 9.   (AB 786)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2175.

The commissioner may offer informal guidance to any prospective applicant for a license under this division, regarding the conditions of licensure that may be applied to that person. The commissioner shall inform any applicant that requests that guidance of the minimum net worth, and other licensing requirements, that will be required of that applicant, based on the information provided by the applicant concerning its plan to conduct business under this division, and the factors used to make that determination as described in Section 2040.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 499, Sec. 16.   (AB 2209)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2176.

At any time, if the commissioner deems it necessary for the general welfare of the public, he or she may exercise any power set forth in this division with respect to a money transmission business, regardless of whether an application for a license has been filed with the commissioner, a license has been issued, or, if issued, the license has been surrendered, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 499, Sec. 17.   (AB 2209)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.25. DIGITAL FINANCIAL ASSETS BUSINESSES [3101. - 3907.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [3101. - 3103.]

3101.

This division shall be known as the Digital Financial Assets Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

For purposes of this division:

(a) “Applicant” means a person that applies for a license under this division.

(b) “Bank” means a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, savings association, or industrial loan company chartered under the laws of this state or any other state or under the laws of the United States.

(c) “Control” means both of the following:

(1) When used in reference to a transaction or relationship involving a digital financial asset, power to execute unilaterally or prevent indefinitely a digital
 financial asset transaction, unless the power to prevent indefinitely is limited to the ability to terminate, suspend, or interrupt a transaction solely in response to unauthorized or fraudulent activity.

(2) When used in reference to a person, the direct or indirect power to do either of the following:

(A) Vote 25 percent or more of any class of the voting securities issued by a person.

(B) Direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, other than a commercial contract
 for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, if no individual is deemed to control a person solely on account of being a director, officer, or employee of such person.

(d) “Covered person” means a person required to obtain a license pursuant to this division.

(e) “Credit union” means a credit union licensed under the laws of this state, or any other state, or a federal credit union chartered under the laws of the United States.

(f) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(g) (1) “Digital financial asset” means a digital representation of value that is used as a medium of exchange, unit of
 account, or store of value, and that is not legal tender, whether or not denominated in legal tender.

(2) “Digital financial asset” does not include any of the following:

(A) A transaction in which a merchant grants, as part of an affinity or rewards program, digital representations of value that primarily relate to the affinity or rewards program and cannot be taken from or exchanged with the merchant for legal tender, bank or credit union credit, or a digital financial asset.

(B) A digital representation of value issued by or on behalf of a publisher and used primarily within online games or game platforms and that is not otherwise a digital financial asset.

(C) A security registered with or exempt from registration with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or a security qualified with or exempt from qualifications with the department.

(D) A digital record of ownership, or equivalent thereto, of tangible or intangible goods, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Works of art, musical compositions, literary works, and similar intellectual property.

(ii) Collectibles, merchandise, virtual land, and in-game assets.

(iii) Digital affinity, loyalty, or
 rewards points granted by a merchant or a network of participating merchants if all of the following are true:

(I) The points cannot be redeemed with a participating merchant in exchange for legal tender, bank or credit union credit, or a digital financial asset.

(II) The points can only be redeemed by participating merchants as part of the purchase of goods or services, which does not include digital financial assets.

(III) The points are granted or redeemed by participating merchants pursuant to a
 formal loyalty program intended to reward frequent customers.

(iv) Licenses, tickets, and similar rights to attend events or participate in activities.

(h) “Digital
 financial asset business activity” means either of the following:

(1) Exchanging, transferring, or storing a digital financial asset.

(2) Holding electronic precious metals or electronic certificates representing interests in precious metals on behalf of another person or issuing shares or electronic certificates representing interests in precious metals.

(i) “Exchange,” when used as a verb, means to assume control of a digital financial asset from, or on behalf of, a resident, at least momentarily, to sell, trade, or convert either of the following:

(1) A digital financial asset for legal tender, bank or credit union credit, or one or more forms of digital financial assets.

(2) Legal tender or bank or credit union credit for one or more forms of digital financial assets.

(j) “Executive officer” includes, but is not limited to, an individual who is a director, officer, manager, managing member, partner, or trustee of a person that is not an individual, or any other person who performs similar policymaking or policy implementation functions.

(k) “Insolvent” means any of the following:

(1) Having generally ceased to pay debts in the
 ordinary course of business other than as a result of a bona fide dispute.

(2) Being unable to pay debts as they become due.

(3) Being insolvent within the meaning of federal bankruptcy law.

(l) “Legal tender” means a medium of exchange or unit of value, including the coin or paper money of the United States, issued by the United States or by another government.

(m) “Licensee” means a person licensed or conditionally licensed under this division.

(n) (1) “Person” means an individual, partnership, estate, business or nonprofit entity, or other legal entity.

(2) “Person” does not include a government-sponsored enterprise, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

(o) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(p) (1) “Resident” means any of the following:

(A) A person who is domiciled in this state.

(B) A person who is physically located in this state for
 more than 183 days of the previous 365 days.

(C) A person who has a place of business in this state.

(D) A legal representative of a person that is domiciled in this state.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “resident” does not include a licensee or an affiliate, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 90005, of a licensee.

(q) “Responsible individual” means an individual who has direct control over,
 or significant management policy and decisionmaking authority with respect to, a licensee’s digital financial asset business activity in this state.

(r) “SAFE Act” means the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-289).

(s) “Sign” means,
 with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, either of the following:

(1) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol.

(2) To attach to, or logically associate with, the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

(t) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of
 Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(u) “Store,” except in the phrase “store of value,” means to maintain control of a digital financial asset on behalf of a resident by a person other than the resident. “Storage” and “storing” have corresponding meanings.

(v) “Transfer” means to assume control of a digital financial asset from, or on behalf of, a resident and to subsequently do any of the following:

(1) Credit the digital financial asset to the account of another person.

(2) Move the digital financial asset from one account of a resident to another account of the same resident.

(3) Relinquish control of a digital financial asset to another person.

(w) “United States dollar equivalent of digital financial assets” means the equivalent value of a particular digital financial asset in United States dollars shown on a digital financial asset exchange based in the United States for a particular date or period specified in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 1.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3103.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this division governs the digital financial asset business activity of a person doing business in this state or, wherever located, who engages in or holds itself out as engaging in the activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(b) This division does not apply to activity by any of the following:

(1) The United States, a state, political subdivision of a state, agency, or instrumentality of federal, state, or local government, or a foreign government or a subdivision, department, agency, or instrumentality of a foreign government.

(2) A bank that is one of the following:

(A) A commercial bank or industrial bank, the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor.

(B) A foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) of Division 1.1 or that is authorized under federal law to maintain a federal agency or federal branch office in this state.

(C) An association or federal association, as defined in Section 5102, the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor.

(3) A trust company licensed pursuant to Section 1042 or a national association
 authorized under federal law to engage in a trust banking business.

(4) A federally chartered or state-chartered credit union, with an office in California, the member accounts of which are insured or guaranteed as provided in Section 14858.

(5) A person whose participation in a payment system is limited to providing processing, clearing, or performing settlement services solely for transactions between or among persons that are exempt from the licensing requirements of this division.

(6) A person engaged in the business of dealing in foreign exchange to the extent the person’s activity meets the definition in Section 1010.605(f)(1)(iv) of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(7) A person that is any of the following:

(A) A person that contributes only connectivity software or computing power to securing a network that records digital financial asset transactions or to a protocol governing transfer of the digital representation of value.

(B) A person that provides only data storage or security services for a business engaged in digital financial asset business activity and does not otherwise engage in digital financial asset business activity on behalf of another person.

(C) A person that provides only to a person otherwise exempt from this division a digital financial asset as one or more enterprise solutions used solely among each
 other and that does not have an agreement or a relationship with a resident that is an end user of a digital financial asset.

(8) A person using a digital financial asset, including creating, investing, buying or selling, or obtaining a digital financial asset as payment for the purchase or sale of goods or services, solely on the person’s own behalf for personal, family, or household purposes or for academic purposes.

(9) A person whose digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, residents is reasonably expected to be valued, in the aggregate, on an annual basis at fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, measured by the United States dollar equivalent of digital financial assets.

(10) An
 attorney to the extent of providing escrow services to a resident.

(11) A title insurance company to the extent of providing escrow services to a resident.

(12) A secured creditor under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code or a creditor with a judicial lien, or lien arising by operation of law, on collateral that is a digital financial asset, if the digital financial asset business activity of the creditor is limited to enforcement of the security interest in compliance with Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code or lien in compliance with the law applicable to the lien.

(13) A person that does not receive compensation, either directly or indirectly, for
 providing digital financial asset products or services or for conducting digital financial asset business activity, including a person who merely retains the ability to terminate, suspend, or interrupt a digital financial transaction solely to prevent unauthorized or fraudulent activity and who is not compensated for that service, or that is engaged in testing products or services with the person’s own funds.

(14) Any entity or futures commission merchant, swap dealer, or introducing broker registered under the federal Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1, et seq.) to the extent those activities are conducted under authority of that act, are actually regulated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, and are entitled to preemption.

(15) A person registered as a
 securities broker-dealer under federal or state securities laws to the extent of its operation as a broker-dealer.

(16) A person that provides clearance or settlement services pursuant to a registration as a clearing agency or an exemption from registration granted under the federal securities laws to the extent of its operation as such a provider.

(17) A merchant that accepts a digital financial asset as payment for the purchase or sale of goods or services, which does not include digital financial assets.

(c) (1) The commissioner may, by regulation or order, either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions or for specified periods, exempt from all or part of this division any person
 or transaction, or class of persons or transactions, if the commissioner finds such action to be in the public interest and that the regulation of such persons or transactions is not necessary for the purposes of this division.

(2) The commissioner shall post on the commissioner’s internet website a list of all persons, transactions, or classes of person or transactions exempt pursuant to this section, and the part or parts of this division from which they are exempt.

(3) The commissioner may, by regulation or order, amend or rescind any exemption made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 2.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Licensure [3201. - 3225.]

3201.

On or after July 1, 2026, a person shall not engage in digital financial asset business activity, or hold itself out as being able to engage in digital financial asset business activity, with or on behalf of a resident unless any of the following is true:

(a) The person is licensed in this state by the department under Section 3203.

(b) The person submits a completed application on or before July 1, 2026, and is awaiting approval or denial of that application.

(c) The person is exempt from licensure under this division pursuant to Section 3103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 3.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

(a) An application for a license under this division shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The application shall be in a form and medium prescribed by the department.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the application shall provide all of the following information relevant to the applicant’s proposed digital financial asset business activity:

(A) The legal name of the applicant, any current or proposed business United States Postal Service mailing address of the applicant, and any fictitious or trade name the applicant